Utah statutes.
58-60-504.   License classification.

The division shall issue substance use disorder counselor licenses to individuals qualified under this part in the classification of:

(1)  licensed advanced substance use disorder counselor;

(2)  certified advanced substance use disorder counselor;

(3)  certified advanced substance use disorder counselor intern;

(4)  licensed substance use disorder counselor;

(5)  certified substance use disorder counselor; and

(6)  certified substance use disorder counselor intern.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2012 General Session

